src/fst/morphology/affixes/inflections-nouns.lexc
LEXICON Z1eZ !!= * @CODE@ 
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>rasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>g2 HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>g2ip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>g2issaar IV_r_stem ;
+GIIP@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>g2iip@U.Num.Pl@ XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:%>%VTRUNCaajar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+ILATSI+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCilatsi IV_voq ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv:%>erniar   flex-iv ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+TAR+Der/vv:%>erniartar    flex-iv ;
+IRSIR+Der/nv:%>erser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>erup XIuteXmorf ;
+KIP+Der/nv:%>kip XItsXmorf ;
+KILLI+Der/nv:%>killi XIi_voqXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCkkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:%>kkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>liar IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>ler XIirXmorf_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>ler HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:%>lerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:%>leri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv:%>lersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>lersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; 
+LISAAR+Der/nv:%>lisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>lisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:%>lisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:%>lior IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>liuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:%>liup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>lup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:%>nip IV_k ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>nngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>nngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+SAR+Der/vv:%>%TRUNCnngorsar DOTR_IV_r ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:%>rpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:%>rpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:%>rpalup IV_k ;
+PASIP+Der/nv:%>rpasip IV-mod_iC ;
+QAR+Der/nv:%>qar IV_r_stem ;
+RSUR+Der/nv:%>rsor IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>si XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>sior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv:%>siuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:%>ssaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+SSIP+Der/nv:%>ssip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
+SSIP+Der/nv:%>ssip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>tu IV_voq ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>tor IV_r ;
+U+Der/nv:%>%VTRUNCaa  IV_voq ;
+U+Der/nv+Orth/Alt:%>u  IV_voq ; !livm 20170525 til 'ikiortiuvoq'
+USAAR+Der/nv:%>usaar IV_r_stem ;
+N+Abs+Sg: Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Pl:%>%TRUNCt K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss:%>g2a Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCra Krestr ; !inera isf. iniga
+N+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCt Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaa Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCia Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCni Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss+TTAAQ:%>%TRUNCnissaaq # ;
+N+Abs+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCkka K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCtit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCai K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCii K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCni K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrput Krestr ; !Z1eZ !regel %> %TRUNC r p u t -> %> p u t || k %> _
!! | --- 
+N+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrsi Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaat Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiat Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCvut K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCgut K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCsi K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaat K_plur ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaat K_plur ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCai K_plur ; !Z1eZ missai
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCii K_plur ; !Z1eZ missai
+N+Abs+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Pl:%>%TRUNCt K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Sg:%>%TRUNCp Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCma Krestr ;
+N+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCvit Krestr ; 
+N+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaata Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiata Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCmi Krestr ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCma K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCvit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaasa K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiisa K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCmi K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtta Krestr ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssi Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaata Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiata Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCmik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtta K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssi K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaasa K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiisa K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCmik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Sg:%>%TRUNCmut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Pl:%>%TRUNCnut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaanut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCianut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCminut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Arch:%>%TRUNCrminut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaanut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCianut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCminut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaannut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiannut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminnut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaannut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiinut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminnut TrmVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCnit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaanit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCianit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCminit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnnit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaanit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaanit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCianiit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VTRUNCaaniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCminit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnit AblVb ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaannit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiannit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminnit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinnit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinnit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaannit AblVb ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiinit AblVb ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminnit AblVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmiit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaaniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCianiit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VTRUNCaaniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCminiit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminiik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaaniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiiniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VTRUNCaaniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaaniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VTRUNCaaniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCminiit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminiik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssinniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaanniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCianniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VTRUNCaanniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssinniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiiniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VTRUNCaanniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCminngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminngaanniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl:%>%TRUNCninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaaninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCianinngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VTRUNCaaninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCmininngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCmininngaanniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCnninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaaninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCianinngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VTRUNCaaninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaaninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VTRUNCaaninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCmininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCmininngaanniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ 
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssinninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaanninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCianninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VTRUNCaanninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminninngaanniit Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminninngaanniik Krestr ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCtsinninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCtsinninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCssinninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCssinninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:%>%VTRUNCaanninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%VTRUNCaanninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ  
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCminninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss+Orth/Alt:%>%TRUNCminninngaanniik K_plur ; !Z1eZ
+N+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCmi LokVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Lok+Pl:%>%TRUNCni LokVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnni LokVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnni LokVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaani LokVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiani LokVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Lok+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCmini LokVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Lok+Pl+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnni LokVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Lok+Pl+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCnni LokVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Lok+Pl+3SgPoss:%>%VTRUNCaani LokVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Lok+Pl+3SgPoss+Err/Sub:%>%VTRUNCiini LokVb ; !Z1eZ
+N+Lok+Pl+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCmini LokVb ; !Z1eZ
